Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Contents of correction orders and conditional licenses. (a) If the commissioner finds that the applicant or license holder has failed to comply with an applicable law or rule and this failure does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program, the commissioner may issue a correction order and an order of conditional license to the applicant or license holder. When issuing a conditional license, the commissioner shall consider the nature, chronicity, or severity of the violation of law or rule and the effect of the violation on the health, safety, or rights of persons served by the program. The correction order or conditional license must state the following in plain language: (1) the conditions that constitute a violation of the law or rule; new text begin (2) whether the conditions were self-reported by the applicant or license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific law or rule violated; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end the time allowed to correct each violation; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end if a license is made conditional, the length and terms of the conditional license, and the reasons for making the license conditional. (b) Nothing in this section prohibits the commissioner from proposing a sanction as specified in section 142B.18, prior to issuing a correction order or conditional license. (c) The commissioner may issue a correction order and an order of conditional license to the applicant or license holder through the provider licensing and reporting hub. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Posting orders on department website. new text end new text begin If the commissioner posts an order of conditional license or a correction order for a licensed family child care provider or child care center on the department's website, the summary information posted for the order must include, at a minimum, whether the license holder self-reported the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule cited in the order. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Fix-it ticket. (a) In lieu of a correction order under section 142B.16, the commissioner shall issue a fix-it ticket to a family child care or child care center license holder if the commissioner finds that: (1) the license holder has failed to comply with a requirement in this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, that the commissioner determines to be eligible for a fix-it ticket; (2) the violation does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program; (3) the license holder did not receive a fix-it ticket or correction order for the violation at the license holder's last licensing inspection; (4) the violation can be corrected at the time of inspection or within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays; and (5) the license holder corrects the violation at the time of inspection or agrees to correct the violation within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. (b) The fix-it ticket must state: (1) the conditions that constitute a violation of the law or rule; new text begin (2) whether the conditions were self-reported by the license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific law or rule violated; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end that the violation was corrected at the time of inspection or must be corrected within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. (c) The commissioner shall not publicly publish a fix-it ticket on the department's website. (d) Within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, of receiving a fix-it ticket, the license holder must correct the violation and within one week submit evidence to the licensing agency that the violation was corrected. (e) If the violation is not corrected at the time of inspection or within 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, or the evidence submitted is insufficient to establish that the license holder corrected the violation, the commissioner must issue a correction order for the violation of Minnesota law or rule identified in the fix-it ticket according to section 142B.16. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 142B.171, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Documented technical assistance. (a) In lieu of a correction order under section 142B.16, the commissioner shall provide documented technical assistance to a family child care or child care center license holder if the commissioner finds that: (1) the license holder has failed to comply with a requirement in this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, that the commissioner determines to be low risk as determined by the child care weighted risk system; (2) the noncompliance does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program; and (3) the license holder did not receive documented technical assistance or a correction order for the same violation at the license holder's most recent annual licensing inspection. (b) Documented technical assistance must include communication from the commissioner to the license holder that: (1) states the conditions that constitute a violation of a law or rule; new text begin (2) identifies whether the conditions were self-reported by the license holder; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end references the specific law or rule violated; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end explains remedies for correcting the violation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.18, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Indication of self-report. new text end new text begin (a) For an order of license suspension, a temporary immediate suspension, a fine, or a revocation issued by the commissioner to a licensed family child care provider or child care center under this section, the order must indicate whether the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule were self-reported by the license holder. new text end new text begin (b) If the commissioner posts an order of license suspension, a temporary immediate suspension, a fine, or a revocation for a licensed family child care provider or child care center on the department's website, the summary information posted for the order must include, at a minimum, whether the license holder self-reported the conditions that constitute the violation of law or rule cited in the order. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.61, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Education on recognizing physical abuse. new text end new text begin (a) Upon a child's enrollment, a licensed child care center and family child care provider must provide parents and caregivers with written materials approved by the commissioner according to paragraph (c) on how to recognize the signs of physical abuse and neglect in infants and children and how to report suspected physical abuse or neglect. The parent or caregiver enrolling the child must sign an attestation that they received the written materials. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed child care center and family child care provider must post and maintain a poster approved by the commissioner according to paragraph (c). The poster must be posted in a place that is visible to people receiving services and all visitors to the facility. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, must: new text end new text begin (1) approve written materials to educate parents and caregivers on how to recognize the signs of physical abuse and neglect in infants and children and how to report suspected physical abuse or neglect. At a minimum, the materials must be available in English and the three most commonly spoken non-English languages in the state as determined by the state demographer for the previous calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) approve a poster to educate parents and caregivers on how to recognize the signs of physical abuse and neglect in infants and children and how to report suspected physical abuse or neglect; and new text end new text begin (3) review and update the written materials and poster every five years. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end